Hawaii statutes.
§235-53 Tax tables for individuals.
(a) Imposition of tax table tax:

(1) In general. In lieu of the tax imposed by
section 235-51, there is hereby imposed for each taxable year on the taxable
income of every individual:

(A) Who does not itemize the individual's
deductions for the taxable year; and

(B) Whose taxable income for such taxable
year does not exceed the ceiling amount,

a tax determined under tables, applicable to
such taxable year, which shall be prescribed by the director. In the tables so
prescribed, the amounts of tax shall be computed on the basis of the rates
prescribed by section 235-51.

(2) Ceiling amount defined. For purposes of
paragraph (1), the term "ceiling amount" means, with respect to any
taxpayer, the amount (not less than $20,000) determined by the director for the
tax rate category in which such taxpayer falls.

(3) Authority to prescribe tables for taxpayers who
itemize deductions. The director may provide that this section shall apply
also for any taxable year to individuals who itemize their deductions. Any
tables prescribed under the preceding sentence shall be on the basis of taxable
income.

(b) Section inapplicable to certain
individuals. This section shall not apply to:

(1) An individual making a return for a period of
less than twelve months on account of a change in annual accounting period, and

(2) An estate or trust.

(c) Tax treated as imposed by section 235-51.
For purposes of this chapter, the tax imposed by this section shall be treated
as tax imposed by section 235-51.

(d) Taxable income. Whenever it is necessary
to determine the taxable income of an individual to whom this section applies,
the taxable income shall be determined under section 235-2.4(a). [L Sp 1957, c
1, pt of §2; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §16; Supp, §121-10; HRS §235-53; am L 1968,
c 8, §2; am L 1977, c 46, §1; am L 1981, c 208, §3; am L 1987, c 239, §1(13),
(14)]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next